Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2889, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2889. Homesteads, as defined in Section 2888 of this


title, are hereby classified for the purpose of taxation as provided


in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution. All


homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the same as


other real property therein, except that each homestead, as defined


by Section 2801 et seq. of this title, shall be exempted from all


forms of ad valorem taxation pursuant to Section 1 of Article XII-A


of the Oklahoma Constitution to the extent of One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00) of the assessed valuation for tax years 1988 through



Req. No. 3380 Page 1


2026 and Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for tax year 2027 and


subsequent tax years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3380 QD 1/15/2026 9:43:19 AM







































Req. No. 3380 Page 2